Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.92.150

Rules.

The office shall adopt rules as may be necessary or appropriate for effecting the provisions of this chapter, in accordance with the provisions of chapter 34.05 RCW, the administrative procedure act.

[ 2011 1st sp.s. c 11 s 167; 2004 c 275 s 43; 1999 c 345 s 7; 1973 c 62 s 4; 1969 ex.s. c 222 s 19. Formerly RCW 28B.10.822, 28.76.530.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2011 1st sp.s. c 11 ss 101-103, 106-202, 204-244, and 301: See note following RCW 28B.76.020.

Intent—2011 1st sp.s. c 11: See note following RCW 28B.76.020.

Part headings not law—2004 c 275: See note following RCW 28B.76.090.

Savings—Severability—1973 c 62: See notes following RCW 28B.10.510.